New York, session 2025-2026, S6511.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The elder law is amended by adding a new article 4 to read 2 as follows: 3 ARTICLE IV 4 INTERGENERATIONAL EDUCATIONAL 5 AND MENTORING SERVICE 6 PROGRAM 7 Section 401. Definitions. 8 402. Local intergenerational educational and mentoring service 9 programs. 10 403. Duties of the director. 11 404. Funding. 12 405. Report. 13 § 401. Definitions. As used in this section: 14 1. "Advisory committee" shall mean the advisory committee for the 15 aging established pursuant to section two hundred ten of this chapter. 16 2. "Designated agency" shall have the same meaning as is ascribed to 17 such term by paragraph (a) of subdivision one of section two hundred 18 fourteen of this chapter. 19 3. "Director" shall mean the director of the office for the aging. 20 4. "Intergenerational educational and mentoring program" shall mean a 21 statewide program administered by the director, in consultation with the 22 commissioner of education, that coordinates a network of local intergen- 23 erational educational and mentoring service programs. 24 5. "Local intergenerational educational and mentoring service program" 25 shall mean a local project that is selected by the director to be the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10963-01-5 S. 6511 2 1 lead agency in each community to coordinate the delivery of support 2 services by members in local elementary schools. 3 6. "Member" shall mean an individual fifty-five years of age or older 4 who volunteers and participates in the activities of a local intergener- 5 ational educational and mentoring service program assisting students. 6 Provided that no person, who replaces any worker providing such services 7 under a contract with a collective bargaining unit, shall be deemed to 8 be a member. 9 7. "Office" shall mean the office for the aging. 10 § 402. Local intergenerational educational and mentoring service 11 programs. The office, through the intergenerational educational and 12 mentoring service program, shall provide all support and assistance to 13 local intergenerational educational and mentoring service programs 14 necessary to implement the provisions of this article. The director 15 shall, through local intergenerational educational and mentoring service 16 programs, offer adults age fifty-five or older placement in service 17 positions assisting students in elementary school. Such service posi- 18 tions shall include result-oriented tutoring, mentoring and other educa- 19 tional support for children and youth in need. The local intergenera- 20 tional educational and mentoring service program shall provide all 21 necessary training to members. Members shall provide both one-on-one 22 assistance and participate in any other activities which benefit an 23 entire school or organizational community. 24 § 403. Duties of the director. 1. The director shall, in consultation 25 with the commissioner of education, promulgate rules and regulations 26 establishing standards and requirements for local intergenerational 27 educational and mentoring service programs receiving grants pursuant to 28 this article. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be 29 limited to: 30 (a) procedures for coordinating and supporting the network of local 31 intergenerational educational and mentoring service programs receiving 32 grants pursuant to this article; 33 (b) procedures for working with public and private schools, colleges, 34 universities, community colleges, community based organizations, the 35 National Senior Service Corps and the lead agencies of local intergener- 36 ational educational and mentoring service programs; 37 (c) a procedure for individuals to apply to become and become members; 38 (d) requirements for participation as a member and as a local inter- 39 generational educational and mentoring service program; 40 (e) standards, based on measurable outcomes, for the evaluation of 41 local intergenerational educational and mentoring service programs; and 42 (f) any other requirements the director determines to be reasonable 43 and necessary. 44 2. The rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision one 45 of this section shall provide for the inclusion of local intergenera- 46 tional educational and mentoring service programs in the planning proc- 47 ess by designated agencies. 48 § 404. Funding. 1. The director shall, within the amounts appropriated 49 therefor, award grants on a competitive basis to not-for-profit corpo- 50 rations and local governments seeking to operate a local intergenera- 51 tional educational and mentoring service program. The director shall 52 consider, in the awarding of grants, the regional needs and the compar- 53 ative wealth of the school district. 54 2. The office may expend not more than three percent of the moneys 55 appropriated, for the purposes of this article, for costs of administer- 56 ing this article. S. 6511 3 1 3. Each local intergenerational educational and mentoring service 2 program shall pay not less than ten percent of its expenses with income 3 derived from private fundraising, school districts or any other source. 4 § 405. Report. The director, in consultation with the advisory commit- 5 tee, affected state agencies, affected municipal agencies, local spon- 6 sors and persons involved in local intergenerational educational and 7 mentoring service programs, shall, on or before December thirty-first, 8 two thousand twenty-six, issue a report to the governor, the temporary 9 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the chair of the 10 senate committee on education, the chair of the senate committee on 11 aging, the chair of the assembly committee on education and the chair of 12 the assembly committee on aging, on the projected cost and benefits of 13 establishing uniform standards and requirements for the operation of 14 local intergenerational educational and mentoring service programs. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 16 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 17 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 18 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 19 completed on or before such effective date.